Nebraska, session 109, LB36A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $51,585 from the Waste
Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $109,036 from the
Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of
Environment and Energy, for Program 513, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 36, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $30,264 for FY2025-26 or
$63,554 for FY2026-27.
-1-